Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF372.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 2 TLSB 1699XS (4) 91 je/js S.F. 372 Section 1. Section 96.4, subsection 3, paragraph b, Code 1 2025, is amended to read as follows: 2 b. Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter to the 3 contrary, the department may establish by rule a process to 4 waive or alter the work search requirements of this subsection 5 for a claim for benefits if an individual has a reasonable 6 expectation that the individual will be returning to employment 7 and is attached to a regular job or industry or a member in 8 good standing of a union therein eligible for referral for 9 employment. To be considered attached to a regular job or 10 industry, an individual must be on a short-term seasonal or 11 temporary layoff. If work is not available at the conclusion 12 of the layoff period due to short-term circumstances beyond 13 the employerâs control, the employer may request an extension 14 of the waiver or alteration for up to two weeks from the 15 department. For purposes of this paragraph, âshort-term 16 seasonal or temporary layoffâ means a layoff period of sixteen 17 weeks or less due to seasonal weather conditions or other 18 conditions that impact the ability to perform work related to 19 highway construction, repair, or maintenance with a specific 20 return-to-work date verified by the employer . 21 Sec. 2. Section 96.5, subsection 3, paragraph b, Code 2025, 22 is amended by adding the following new subparagraphs: 23 NEW SUBPARAGRAPH . (4) (a) If the individual has a 24 reasonable expectation that the individual will be returning 25 to employment, as defined by the department by rule, and 26 is attached to a regular job or industry or is a member in 27 good standing of a union therein eligible for referral for 28 employment. 29 (b) To be considered attached to a regular job or industry, 30 an individual must be on a short-term seasonal or temporary 31 layoff as defined in section 96.4, subsection 3. 32 NEW SUBPARAGRAPH . (5) If all of the following circumstances 33 apply: 34 (a) The individual is unemployed due to the individualâs 35 -1- LSB 1699XS (4) 91 je/js 1/ 3 S.F. 372 employer temporarily ceasing operations or going out of 1 business at the factory, establishment, or other premises at 2 which the individual was last employed. 3 (b) The reason for the employer going out of business was a 4 result of unforeseen circumstances, including but not limited 5 to cybersecurity attacks. 6 (c) The individual has a reasonable expectation that the 7 individual will be returning to employment with the employer 8 that temporarily ceased operations or went out of business. 9